Illinois, session 104th, HB803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Live Theater Production Tax Credit Act is 5amended by changing Section 10-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 17/10-1)7    Sec. 10-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Live Theater Production Tax Credit Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 97-636, eff. 6-1-12.)